Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.400

Health care and group insurance.

Subject to chapter 48.62 RCW, any county by a majority vote of its board of county commissioners may enter into contracts to provide health care services and/or group insurance for the benefit of its employees, and may pay all or any part of the cost thereof. Any two or more counties, by a majority vote of their respective boards of county commissioners may, if deemed expedient, join in the procuring of such health care services and/or group insurance, and the board of county commissioners of each participating county may, by appropriate resolution, authorize their respective counties to pay all or any portion of the cost thereof.

Nothing in this section shall impair the eligibility of any employee of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision under RCW 41.04.205.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 21; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 106 s 7; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.400. Prior: 1957 c 106 s 1; 1955 c 51 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date, implementation, application—1991 sp.s. c 30: See RCW 48.62.900.